test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-fadda_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - fáddá: # á-stems
    fáddá+N+Sg+Nom: fáddá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Gen: fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Acc: fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Ill: fáádán
    fáddá+N+Sg+Loc: fáádást
    fáddá+N+Sg+Abe: fádáttáá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Com: fáddáin
    fáddá+N+Ess: fáddán
    fáddá+N+Par: fáddád
    fáddá+N+Pl+Nom: fáádáh
    fáddá+N+Pl+Gen: fáádái
    fáddá+N+Pl+Acc: fáádáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Loc: fáádáin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Ill: fáddáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Com: fádáiguin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Abe: fádáittáá
